Georgia statutes. 
(38) "Single-family housing bond" means any obligation described as a qualified mortgage bond in Section 143 of the Federal Code.

(39) "Small issue bond" means any obligation described as a qualified small issue bond in Section 144(a) of the Federal Code.

(40) "State" means the State of Georgia.

(41) "State ceiling" means for any calendar year the state ceiling applicable to the state, as such term is used in the Federal Code. The amount of the state ceiling shall be determined in accordance with the provisions of the Federal Code.

(42) "Student loan bond" means any obligation described as a qualified student loan bond in Section 144(b) of the Federal Code.

(43) "System" means the Georgia Allocation System as established by this article.

(44) "UDAG bonds" means any issue of bonds 95 percent or more of the net proceeds of which are to be used to provide facilities with respect to which an urban development action grant, under Section 119 of the Housing and Community Development Act of 1974, as amended, has been applied for and which, if such grant is made, would be an issue described in Section 144(a)(4)(F) of the Federal Code.

(45) "Unused amount" means, as of any date when the unused amount of any share is computed, the amount of any share from which notices of allocation were authorized to be given during a prior period, if any, but with respect to which either no notices of allocation were given during such period or notices of allocation were given but confirmation of issuance was not filed with the department on or before the applicable expiration date plus the amount of any share from which notices of allocation have been given during the period which includes the date of computation but with respect to which confirmation of issuance was not filed with the department on or before the applicable expiration date.

(46) "Urban residential finance authority" means any authority established under Chapter 41 of this title.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-82-182, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 486, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 165, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 817, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 94, § 36; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1653, § 2-2; Ga. L. 1993, p. 91, § 36.)

36-82-183. Powers of department.

Statute text

The department shall administer, operate, and manage the system. Action taken by the department, however, shall not constitute an opinion of the department on any legal matters with respect to the federal or state tax treatment of any bonds. Without limiting the generality of the department's power and authority to administer, operate, and manage the system, the department shall make such determinations and decisions, promulgate such rules, require the use of such forms, establish such procedures, and otherwise administer, operate, and manage the system in such respects as may be, in the department's determination, necessary, desirable, or incident to its responsibilities as the administrator, operator, and manager of the system. The General Assembly recognizes and acknowledges that the department will encounter situations which have not been foreseen or provided for in this article and expressly delegates to the department the power and authority to administer, operate, and manage the system in all situations and circumstances, both foreseen and unforeseen, including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the power and authority to control and establish procedures for controlling any misuse or abuses of the system and the power and authority to resolve conflicts or inconsistencies, if any, in this article or which may arise in administering, operating, or managing the system pursuant to this article. Any decision which the commissioner or the department makes, and any action or inaction by the commissioner or the department, in administering, managing, and operating the system shall be final and conclusive and shall not be subject to any review, whether judicial, administrative, or otherwise, and shall not be covered by, subject to, or required to comply with or satisfy any provisions of Chapter 13 of Title 50, the "Georgia Administrative Procedure Act." The system depends upon the truthfulness of representations made and information submitted in or accompanying applications. The department may use all of the power and authority granted in this article, and such other power or authority as the commissioner may deem necessary or appropriate, in order to take action against those who fail to comply with any of the provisions of this article or who fail to display the truthfulness, which shall include the completeness necessary to avoid untruthfulness by omission, which the commissioner deems necessary for the system. Without limiting the generality of this article, the General Assembly expressly delegates to the department the power and authority to control, permit to be used, or refuse to permit to be used any allocation which would reduce the state ceiling under Section 146(m) of the Federal Code, dealing with the private activity portion of governmental use bonds; and the department, to accomplish this end, may impose requirements upon any issuer, including any other agency or department of the state or any county or municipality or agency, department, or authority of a county or municipality within the state.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-82-183, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 486, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 817, § 1.)

Annotations

Code Commission notes. - Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1987, a comma was inserted following the second "operate" in the third sentence.

36-82-184. Determination of state ceiling; records required.

Statute text

(a) The amount of the state ceiling shall be determined by the department in accordance with the Federal Code. The amount of the state ceiling available at any time shall be the amount, determined by the department, which results from subtracting from the state ceiling:

(1) The amount of bonds issued pursuant to notices of allocation and with respect to which confirmation of issuance has been received by the department on or before the applicable expiration date; and

(2) The amount of bonds covered by notices of allocation outstanding but with respect to which the expiration date has not occurred and with respect to which no confirmation of issuance has been filed with the department.

(b) The department shall keep separate records for the economic development share, housing share, and flexible share and shall make available to the public, by telephone recording or periodic news release or such other means as the department may determine to be appropriate, information with respect to the available amount of the economic development share, housing share, and flexible share.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-82-184, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 486, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 817, § 1.)

36-82-185. Application for notice of allocation; receipt of application; issue of notice; confirmation of bond issue; certificates under Federal Code.

Statute text

(a) Applications for notices of allocation shall be filed, received, and acted on by the department as set forth in this Code section.

(b) Applications shall be filed on such forms as the commissioner shall require. Each application shall be accompanied by the following:

(1) A copy of the inducement resolution or other similar official action taken by the issuer with respect to the bonds and the project which are the subject of the application, signed by an officer, or a designee of said officer, of the issuer;

(2) An affidavit, or copy thereof, of the publisher of the newspaper or newspapers in which the notice of the public hearing required by Section 147(f) of the Federal Code was published, demonstrating that notice of such public hearing was published, and a copy of the approval of the governmental unit or governmental units required by Section 147(f) of the Federal Code, certified by a public official with the authority to certify such approval. This requirement shall not apply to any bonds:

(A) For which Section 147(f) of the Federal Code does not require such a public hearing and approval of a governmental unit or governmental units; or

(B) Projects requiring the approval of the Georgia State Financing and Investment Commission;

(3) A written opinion of legal counsel, addressed to the department, to the effect that the issuer is authorized under the laws of the state to issue bonds for projects of the same type and nature as the project which is the subject of the application. This opinion shall cite by constitutional or statutory reference, including a reference to the session laws of the General Assembly in the case of a constitutional reference, the provision of the Constitution or law of the state which authorizes the bonds for the project;

(4) A written commitment from a lender, financial institution, underwriter, investment banker, or other purchaser, addressed to the department, to purchase the bonds upon delivery by the issuer. In the discretion of the commissioner, this requirement may be waived in the event an officer of the issuer certifies, in writing, that the bonds subject to the application will be issued on a competitive bid basis;

(5) Any additional items specified elsewhere in this article; and

(6) Any other information as reasonably required by the department.

(c) All applications shall apply for amounts of the state ceiling specified in even amounts of $1,000.00.

(d) If more than one person is a borrower with respect to any issue of bonds, any one of such persons may, and all such persons shall not be required to, execute any application, letter, or writing which this article requires to be executed by the borrower.

(e) The department shall stamp or otherwise designate the date on which it receives each completed application. The date stamped or otherwise designated for any application received after the close of business on a business day will be the next business day. For this purpose, the close of business shall be the time officially designated for the close of the department's business day. The application shall not be considered completed and shall not be stamped and accepted for filing unless and until each of the items required under subsection (b) of this Code section has been received by the department. Receipt shall be deemed to occur only on a business day.

(f) A notice of allocation shall constitute the only means by which any of the state ceiling shall be allocated to a specific issuer for a specific issue of bonds. Any bonds for which no notice of allocation is given shall not be deemed to have been allocated as a part of the state ceiling as required by the Federal Code and shall be deemed to be bonds issued in excess of the issuer's private activity bond limit under the Federal Code.

(g) The notice of allocation shall be in writing, shall be given to the issuer at the address specified in the application, shall specify the amount of bonds which may be issued, and shall specify the expiration date. The notice of allocation shall be in such form as the commissioner shall determine. A notice of allocation may not be revoked although it shall expire in accordance with the provisions of this article. All notices of allocation shall be given for amounts of the state ceiling specified in even amounts of $1,000.00.

(h) When bonds covered by a notice of allocation have been issued, confirmation of issuance shall be filed with the department immediately and must be filed on or before the expiration date. Unless otherwise determined by the commissioner, the expiration date for any notice of allocation shall never be later than the second to last business day of a calendar year. To the extent necessary to accomplish this, the department shall shorten the time period otherwise allowed to lapse before an expiration date. If bonds are not issued and confirmation of issuance is not filed with the department on or before the expiration date, the notice of allocation shall cease to be effective. The confirmation of issuance shall be deemed to have been filed with the department on the earliest of:

(1) The date it is actually delivered to the department;

(2) If mailed by the United States mail, certified return receipt requested, the date of the postmark;

(3) If sent to the department by a nongovernmental courier or delivery service, the date delivered to that service; or

(4) If sent by facsimile machine, the date received by the department.

(i) Notwithstanding any provisions of this article to the contrary, the department shall not be required to accept any application for notice of allocation filed with the department after December 15 of each year.

(j) A notice of allocation shall not be effective if the bonds actually issued pursuant to such notice of allocation are in an aggregate principal amount which is less than 90 percent of the amount of bonds authorized by such notice of allocation. The department shall, at the written request of the issuer submitted to the department prior to the actual issuance of the bonds, amend the notice of allocation so as not to be in conflict with this subsection.

(k) The department may, at the written request of an issuer, increase the amount of a notice of allocation by an amount not to exceed 10 percent of the amount of the original application. The department shall not, however, have any obligation to provide such an increase, and no issuer shall have any right to such an increase.

(l) If any issuer in receipt of a notice of allocation fails to have issued the bonds subject to the notice of allocation on or before the expiration date, the project subject to the notice of allocation shall not be eligible to receive an additional notice of allocation for six months after the date of the expiration date of the original notice of allocation. This subsection, however, shall not apply to those projects in which the issuer notifies the department, in writing, 15 days prior to the expiration date of the notice of allocation that the bonds subject to the notice of allocation will not be issued.

(m) The opinions of legal counsel and the commitment from a lender, financial institution, underwriter, investment banker, or other purchaser which are required to accompany applications shall be dated no more than 30 days prior to the date on which the application is filed. Such opinions, such commitment, and any other items required to accompany an application shall be in substantially the form or forms promulgated by the commissioner.

(n) Notices of allocation and other notices and written communications from the department shall be deemed to have been given when duly deposited in the United States mail, first class with all postage prepaid. Notices of allocation may, at the request of the borrower, be picked up by hand or delivered by courier or other delivery service, at the expense of the borrower. Notices and other written communications to and filings with the department shall be given or made either by actual delivery to the office of the commissioner in Atlanta, Georgia, directed to the attention of the bond allocation manager, or by depositing the same in the United States mail, first class with all postage prepaid, addressed to the office of the commissioner in Atlanta, Georgia, directed to the attention of the bond allocation manager. Such notices and other written communications shall be deemed received only upon actual receipt by the department.

(o) The department shall furnish to the issuer receiving a notice of allocation a certificate of the commissioner certifying under penalty of perjury that the allocation evidenced by the notice of allocation was not made in consideration of any bribe, gift, gratuity, or direct or indirect contribution to any political campaign, in such form as the department may specify or as may be required pursuant to the Federal Code.

(p) The commissioner of the department is designated, for any purpose required under the Federal Code, as the state official who shall certify that bonds meet the requirements of the state ceiling, in such form as the department may specify or as may be required pursuant to Section 149(e) of the Federal Code and any other applicable Federal Code section or United States Department of the Treasury regulations promulgated pursuant to the Federal Code.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-82-185, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 486, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 817, § 1.)

36-82-186. Economic development share.

Statute text

(a) Commencing on April 1, 1990, the economic development share for 1990 is established in an amount equal to 40 percent of the state ceiling. The 1990 percentage shall include any allocations made from the competitive pool prior to April 1, 1990. The economic development share for 1991 and each year thereafter is established in an amount equal to 42 1/2 percent of the state ceiling. The economic development share shall be divided among the periods of the year as follows:

(1) In 1990, during period 2, notices of allocation may be given for amounts up to 100 percent of the economic development share, minus the amount of any notices of allocation from the competitive pool made prior to April 1, 1990; and

(2) In 1991 and each year thereafter:

(A) During period 1, notices of allocation may be given for amounts up to 40 percent of the economic development share;

(B) During period 2, notices of allocation may be given for amounts up to 40 percent of the economic development share; and

(C) During period 3, notices of allocation may be given for amounts up to 20 percent of the economic development share.

(b) At any time, notices of allocation may be given for any unused amount.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-82-186, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 486, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 817, § 1.)

Annotations

Cross references. - Elimination of economic development share, § 36-82-197.

36-82-187. Application for economic development share and competitive pool allocation; priority of and approval of application; carrying over; time and amount limitation.

Statute text

(a) Applications for notices of allocation from the economic development share must be received by the department no later than June 30 of 1990 or September 30 of 1991 and September 30 each year thereafter. Applications for notices of allocation from the economic development share may only be filed for small issue bonds, exempt facility bonds, the private activity portion of governmental use bonds, or any other bond meeting the employment test required by Code Section 36-82-188 on the terms set forth in this Code section. Notwithstanding any provisions of this article to the contrary, the department shall not be required to accept any application for a notice of allocation for exempt facility bonds or the private activity portion of governmental use bonds from the economic development share; and no issuer shall have any right to such an allocation.

(b) In addition to the items specified in Code Section 36-82-185, each application shall be accompanied by the following, where applicable:

(1) If the application is for UDAG bonds:

(A) A copy of the application submitted to the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development for an urban development action grant; and

(B) A written opinion of legal counsel, addressed to the department, to the effect that the bonds which are covered by the application will, based upon the information available at that time to such legal counsel, qualify as UDAG bonds when issued;

(2) If the employment test applies with respect to jobs retained, a written certification which satisfies the employment test, as required by Code Section 36-82-188;

(3) If the application is for exempt facility bonds, a written opinion of legal counsel addressed to the department to the effect that the bonds covered by the application will, based upon the information available at that time to such legal counsel, qualify as exempt facility bonds when issued;

(4) If the application is for the private activity portion of governmental use bonds, a written opinion of legal counsel addressed to the department to the effect that the bonds covered by the application will, based upon the information available at that time to such legal counsel, qualify as the private activity portion of governmental use bonds when issued; and

(5) If the application is for exempt facility bonds or the private activity portion of governmental use bonds, a written statement of the issuer addressed to the department describing the economic impact of the proposed project on the territorial area of the issuer.

(c) The department shall give its notice of allocation approving the allocation requested by the qualified application within 15 days after the department receives the completed application to the extent that amounts in the economic development share remain available for notices of allocation. Such notices of allocation shall be given with respect to qualified applications in the chronological order, by date, in which the completed qualified applications were received by the department.

(d) If the qualified applications received on the same date request notices of allocation that would exceed the amount of the economic development share which, at the time, remains available for notice of allocation, the department shall decide, within 30 days, which qualified application or qualified applications shall receive a notice of allocation by applying the policy guidelines. The decision of the department shall be final and conclusive.

(e) If at any time none of the economic development share remains available for notices of allocation, but additional amounts of the economic development share become available later because confirmation of issuance was not filed with the department on or before the applicable expiration date for any notice or notices of allocation or for any other reason, the department shall give a notice of allocation with respect to qualified applications including any qualified applications which failed to receive a notice of allocation pursuant to subsection (d) of this Code section. Such notices of allocation shall be given, to the extent that the economic development share becomes available, with respect to qualified applications in the chronological order, by date, in which they were received by the department and, if necessary, by again applying the procedures set forth in subsection (d) of this Code section.

(f) Qualified applications received during a period which do not receive a notice of allocation during that period shall automatically be deemed to have been received on the first day of the next period. In order to be deemed automatically to have been received on the first day of the next period, however, any such qualified application received by the department more than 45 days prior to the first day of the next period must be certified as current, not more than 30 days prior to the first day of the next period, by a letter from the issuer, addressed to the department and received by the department prior to the first day of the next period, certifying that the information contained in the qualified application and all items accompanying the qualified application are and remain accurate and in full force and effect, except as may be specifically set forth in any amendment to the qualified application which does not result in the application's failing to constitute a qualified application received by the department at or before the receipt of such certification. If such certification is received by the department after the first day of the next period, the application shall be deemed to have been resubmitted and received on the date when such certification was received.

(g) Notwithstanding any provisions of this Code section to the contrary, the department may, in its discretion, give a notice of allocation from the flexible share with respect to any qualified application which is not given a notice of allocation from the economic development share.

(h) Notwithstanding any provisions of this Code section to the contrary, the department shall not be required to give a notice of allocation from the economic development share for any bond in an amount of more than $10 million.

(i) (1) The expiration date for a notice of allocation from the economic development share, other than for UDAG bonds, shall be the first business day which occurs on or after the seventy-fifth day after the date on which the notice of allocation is given.

(2) The expiration date for a notice of allocation for UDAG bonds may, in the department's discretion, be the first business day which occurs on or after the one hundred-eightieth day after the date on which the notice of allocation is given. The department shall not, however, have any obligation to provide an expiration date in excess of 75 days, and no issuer shall have any right to an expiration date in excess of 75 days.

(3) The department may, for good cause shown by the issuer in a written statement submitted to the department prior to such expiration date, extend the expiration date for one, but only one, additional period which shall expire, at the department's discretion, on any date not later than 30 days after the original expiration date. The department shall not, however, have any obligation to provide such an extension; and no issuer shall have any right to such an extension.

(j) If confirmation of issuance is not filed with the department on or before the applicable expiration date, the notice of allocation shall cease to be effective and the amount covered by the notice of allocation shall automatically be added to:

(1) The economic development share if the notice of allocation ceases to be in effect prior to July 1 of 1990 or October 1 of 1991 and October 1 of each year thereafter; or

(2) The flexible share if the notice of allocation ceases to be in effect between July 1 of 1990 and December 31 of 1990 or October 1 of 1991 and December 31 of 1991 and October 1 and December 31 each year thereafter.

(k) On July 1, 1990, and October 1, 1991, and October 1 in each year thereafter the economic development share shall expire and any unused amounts remaining in the economic development share and any amounts for which the notice of allocation ceases to be in effect shall automatically be added to the flexible share.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-82-187, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 486, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 165, § 2; Ga. L. 1990, p. 817, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 91, § 36.)

36-82-188. Employment test.

Statute text

(a) In order to qualify for a notice of allocation from the economic development share, a project must satisfy the employment tests as defined in this Code section. To satisfy the employment tests, a project must either:

(1) Be reasonably expected to increase employment within the territorial area of operation of the issuer by not less than one job for each $125,000.00 or part thereof in bond financing. This requirement shall be known as the increased employment test; or

(2) Be reasonably expected to retain within the territorial area of operation of the issuer not less than one job for each $125,000.00 or part thereof in bond financing. This requirement shall be known as the retained employment test.

(b) The increased employment test shall be satisfied if a borrower reasonably expects that the required additional jobs will be available not later than two years after completion of the project and certifies to this effect in writing. The retained employment test shall be satisfied if the borrower certifies in writing, addressed to the department, that, except for the issuance of the bonds which are the subject of the application, such borrower or other entity which operates the project reasonably expects that it would, within two years after the date of the application, either cease operation at the site of the project, thereby reducing employment by not less than the required number, or reduce employment by not less than the required number without ceasing operation.

(c) A job shall mean, for purposes of either employment test, a position held by a full-time, paid employee with no agreement or arrangement which would limit the duration of such employment. Such an employee either must spend substantially all of his time on the job performing the duties of his job at the location of the project or must be based at the project and spend substantially all of his time on the job performing the duties of his job within the territorial area of operation of the issuer.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-82-189, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 486, § 1; Code 1981, § 36-82-188, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1990, p. 817, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 91, § 36.)

Annotations

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 1990, p. 817, § 1, effective April 4, 1990, redesignated former Code Section 36-82-189 as present Code Section 36-82-188; and repealed the former Code Section 36-82-188, which was based on Ga. L. 1987, p. 486, § 1, and which pertained to applications for notices of allocation from the rural area pool.

36-82-189. Housing share.

Statute text

Commencing on April 1, 1990, the housing share for 1990 is established in an amount equal to 40 percent of the state ceiling. The 1990 percentage shall include any allocations made from the housing share made prior to April 1, 1990. The housing share for 1991 and each year thereafter is established in an amount equal to 42 1/2 percent of the state ceiling.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-82-190, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 486, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 165, § 3; Code 1981, § 36-82-189, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1990, p. 817, § 1.)

Annotations

Cross references. - Elimination of housing share, § 36-82-197.

Editor's notes. - Former Code Section 36-82-189 was redesignated by Ga. L. 1990, p. 817, § 1 as present Code Section 36-82-188.

36-82-190. Reservations from housing share.

Statute text

(a) Commencing on April 1, 1990, and extending through June 30, 1990, and for 1991 and each year thereafter commencing on January 1 and extending through September 30, reservations from the housing share shall be as follows:

(1) Sixty-two percent shall be reserved for the Georgia Housing and Finance Authority for any qualified housing project. This shall be known as the state housing reservation;

(2) Nineteen percent shall be reserved for urban residential finance authorities for any qualified housing project. This shall be known as the urban housing reservation; and

(3) Nineteen percent shall be reserved for local housing authorities for any qualified housing projects. This shall be known as the local housing reservation. The local housing reservation shall be available for notices of allocation on a first-come, first-served basis. If applications exceed the amount available, the department shall apply the policy guidelines provided in Code Section 36-82-195.

(b) Any allocations made in 1990 prior to April 1, 1990, shall be subtracted from the total sum which would be available to an issuer based upon which reservation the issuer qualified for and based upon the percentage formula provided in this Code section.

(c) On July 1, 1990, and October 1, 1991, and October 1 in each year thereafter, the housing share shall expire and any unused amounts remaining in the housing share and any amounts for which the notice of allocation ceases to be in effect shall automatically be added to the flexible share.

(d) If at any time amounts of the state housing reservation or the urban housing reservation remain available for allocation, the Georgia Housing and Finance Authority or the urban residential finance authorities may, upon written notification to the department, transfer any available reservation, or any part thereof, to the state housing reservation, urban housing reservation, or the local housing reservation, if the issuer making the transfer anticipates that such amounts are more likely to be used in the reservation to which the transfer is made.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-82-190, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 817, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 94, § 36; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1653, § 2-3.)

Annotations

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 1990, p. 817, § 1, effective April 4, 1990, redesignated former Code Section 36-82-190 as present Code Section 36-82-189.

36-82-191. Applications for single-family bond projects; issue of notice; confirmation; exploration.

Statute text

(a) Applications for single-family bond projects must be filed no later than June 30 of 1990 or September 30 of 1991 and September each year thereafter to be eligible to receive an allocation from the housing share.

(b) Each application for a single-family project shall be accompanied by the following:

(1) The items specified in Code Section 36-82-185;

(2) A written opinion of legal counsel, addressed to the department, to the effect that the bonds which are covered by the application will, based upon the information available at that time to such legal counsel, qualify as single-family housing bonds when issued; and

(3) A letter addressed to the department demonstrating that as of the date of the application for notice of allocation the applicant has reserved to individual mortgagors or projects at least 80 percent of the proceeds of any previous single-family bond issue and, if applicable, actually purchased or underwritten at least 25 percent of the loans funded from all previous single-family bond issues of the applicant for any single-family bond issue.

(c) The department shall give its notice of allocation approving the allocation requested by a qualified application within 15 days after the department receives the completed application, provided that the amount of the applications does not exceed the reservations established in Code Section 36-82-190. Such notices of allocation shall be given with respect to qualified applications in the chronological order, by date, in which the completed qualified applications were received by the department.

(d) The provisions of subsections (e) and (g) of Code Section 36-82-187 with respect to notices of allocation from the economic development share shall also apply to notices of allocation from the single-family bond projects from the local housing reservation.

(e) The expiration date for a notice of allocation for a single-family housing project from any housing reservation shall be 75 days following the date of notice of allocation. The department may, for good cause shown by an issuer, extend the expiration date by not more than 30 days, but no issuer shall have any right to such an extension.

(f) If the confirmation of issuance is not filed with the department on or before the expiration date, the notice of allocation shall cease to be effective and the amount covered by the notice of allocation shall automatically be transferred to and added to the respective reservation in the housing share if on or before June 30 of 1990 or September 30 of 1991 and September 30 each year thereafter or the flexible share if after June 30 of 1990 or September 30 of 1991 and September 30 each year thereafter.

(g) Notwithstanding any provision of this article to the contrary, the commissioner may, for good cause shown by an issuer in a written request addressed to the department, waive the provision of paragraph (3) of subsection (b) of this Code section.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-82-192, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 486, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 165, § 4; Code 1981, § 36-82-191, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1990, p. 817, § 1.)

Annotations

Editor's notes. - Former Code Section 36-82-191, based on Ga. L. 1987, p. 486, § 1, relating to single-family, multifamily, and general pools, was repealed by Ga. L. 1990, p. 817, § 1, which also enacted the current Code section.

36-82-191.1. Allocation of housing share; expiration date of notice of allocation; state and urban housing share set-aside exempt from subparagraphs (b)(3)(A) through (b)(3)(C).

Statute text

Repealed by Ga. L. 1990, p. 817, § 1, effective April 4, 1990.

Annotations

Editor's notes. - This Code section was based on Ga. L. 1989, p. 165, § 5.

36-82-192. Requirements for applications for qualified residential rental projects; periods for notices of allocation; expiration dates for notices; confirmation of issuance required.

Statute text

(a) Applications for qualified residential rental projects shall be accompanied by the following:

(1) The items specified in Code Section 36-82-185;

(2) A written opinion of legal counsel addressed to the department to the effect that the bonds which are covered by the application will, based upon the information available at that time to such legal counsel, qualify as exempt facility bonds for the financing of a qualified residential rental project when issued;

(3) A written statement of the issuer, addressed to the department, to the effect that the bonds which are covered by the application will, based upon the information available at that time to such issuer, comply with local zoning laws, statutes, ordinances, and resolutions; and

(4) If the project is expected to be issued in combination with a HoDAG, a copy of the application submitted to the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development for a housing development action grant.

(b) If the amount of bonds covered by applications received does not exceed the amount of the local housing reservation, the department shall give its notice of allocation, approving the allocation requested by each application within 15 days after the filing date.

(c) If the amount of bonds covered by applications received on or before the filing date exceeds the amount of the local housing reservation, the department shall determine allocations by applying the policy guidelines. The department shall give its notices of allocation with respect to those applications which it selects not later than 30 days after the filing date. The decision of the department shall be final and conclusive.

(d) The department shall not be required to give notices of allocation from the local housing reservation for any qualified residential rental housing project in an aggregate principal amount of more than 25 percent of the amount of the local housing reservation.

(e) The provisions of subsections (d), (e), and (g) of Code Section 36-82-187 with respect to notices of allocation from the economic development share shall also apply to notices of allocation from the local housing reservation.

(f) (1) The expiration date for a notice of allocation for a qualified residential rental project from the local housing reservation, other than one expected to be issued in combination with a HoDAG, shall be the first business day which occurs on or after the seventy-fifth day after the date on which the notice of allocation is given.

(2) The expiration date for a notice of allocation expected to be issued in combination with a HoDAG may, in the department's discretion, be the first business day which occurs on or after the one hundred-eightieth day after the date on which the notice of allocation is given. The department shall not, however, have any obligation to provide an expiration date in excess of 75 days, and no issuer shall have any right to an expiration date in excess of 75 days.

(3) The department may, for good cause shown by the issuer in a written statement submitted to the department prior to such expiration date, extend the expiration date for one, but only one, additional period which shall expire, at the department's discretion, on any date not later than 30 days after the original expiration date. The department shall not, however, have any obligation to provide such an extension; and no issuer shall have any right to such an extension.
